Utah statutes.
72-7-406.   Oversize permits and oversize and overweight permits for vehicles of excessive size or weight -- Applications -- Restrictions -- Fees -- Rulemaking provisions -- Penalty.

(1) (a)  The department may, upon receipt of an application and good cause shown, issue in writing an oversize permit or an oversize and overweight permit.  The oversize permit or oversize and overweight permit may authorize the applicant to operate or move upon a highway:

(i)  a vehicle or combination of vehicles, unladen or with a load weighing more than the maximum weight specified in Section 72-7-404 for any wheel, axle, group of axles, or total gross weight; or

(ii)  a vehicle or combination of vehicles that exceeds the vehicle width, height, or length provisions under Section 72-7-402.

(b)  Except as provided under Subsection (8), an oversize and overweight permit may not be issued under this section to allow the transportation of a load that is reasonably divisible.

(c)  The maximum size or weight authorized by a permit under this section shall be within limits that do not impair the state's ability to qualify for federal-aid highway funds.

(d)  The department may deny or issue a permit under this section to protect the safety of the traveling public and to protect highway foundation, surfaces, or structures from undue damage by one or more of the following:

(i)  limiting the number of trips the vehicle may make;

(ii)  establishing seasonal or other time limits within which the vehicle may operate or move on the highway indicated;

(iii)  requiring security in addition to the permit to compensate for any potential damage by the vehicle to any highway; and

(iv)  otherwise limiting the conditions of operation or movement of the vehicle.

(e)  Prior to granting a permit under this section, the department shall approve the route of any vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(2)  An application for a permit under this section shall state:

(a)  the proposed maximum wheel loads, maximum axle loads, all axle spacings of each vehicle or combination of vehicles;

(b)  the proposed maximum load size and maximum size of each vehicle or combination of vehicles;

(c)  the specific roads requested to be used under authority of the permit; and

(d)  if the permit is requested for a single trip or if other seasonal limits or time limits apply.

(3)  Each oversize permit or oversize and overweight permit shall be carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers and shall be available for inspection by any peace officer, special function officer, port of entry agent, or other personnel authorized by the department.

(4)  A permit under this section may not be issued or is not valid unless the vehicle or combination of vehicles is:

(a)  properly registered for the weight authorized by the permit; or

(b)  registered for a gross laden weight of 78,001 pounds or over, if the gross laden weight authorized by the permit exceeds 80,000 pounds.

(5) (a) (i)  An oversize permit may be issued under this section for a vehicle or combination of vehicles that exceeds one or more of the maximum width, height, or length provisions under Section 72-7-402.

(ii)  Except for an annual oversize permit for an implement of husbandry under Section 72-7-407 or for an annual oversize permit issued under Subsection (5)(a)(iii), only a single trip oversize permit may be issued for a vehicle or combination of vehicles that is more than 14 feet 6 inches wide, 14 feet high, or 105 feet long.

(iii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules for the issuance of an annual oversize permit for a vehicle or combination of vehicles that is more than 14 feet 6 inches wide, 14 feet high, or 105 feet long if the department determines that the permit is needed to accommodate highway transportation needs for multiple trips on a specified route.

(b)  The fee is $30 for a single trip oversize permit under this Subsection (5).  This permit is valid for not more than 96 continuous hours.

(c)  The fee is $75 for a semiannual oversize permit under this Subsection (5).  This permit is valid for not more than 180 continuous days.

(d)  The fee is $90 for an annual oversize permit under this Subsection (5).  This permit is valid for not more than 365 continuous days.

(6) (a)  An oversize and overweight permit may be issued under this section for a vehicle or combination of vehicles carrying a nondivisible load that exceeds one or more of the maximum weight provisions of Section 72-7-404 up to a gross weight of 125,000 pounds.

(b)  The fee is $60 for a single trip oversize and overweight permit under this Subsection (6).  This permit is valid for not more than 96 continuous hours.

(c)  A semiannual oversize and overweight permit under this Subsection (6) is valid for not more than 180 continuous days.  The fee for this permit is:

(i)  $180 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 80,000 pounds, but not exceeding 84,000 pounds;

(ii)  $320 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 84,000 pounds, but not exceeding 112,000 pounds; and

(iii)  $420 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 112,000 pounds, but not exceeding 125,000 pounds.

(d)  An annual oversize and overweight permit under this Subsection (6) is valid for not more than 365 continuous days.  The fee for this permit is:

(i)  $240 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 80,000 pounds, but not exceeding 84,000 pounds;

(ii)  $480 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 84,000 pounds, but not exceeding 112,000 pounds; and

(iii)  $540 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 112,000 pounds, but not exceeding 125,000 pounds.

(7) (a)  A single trip oversize and overweight permit may be issued under this section for a vehicle or combination of vehicles carrying a nondivisible load that exceeds:

(i)  one or more of the maximum weight provisions of Section 72-7-404; or

(ii)  a gross weight of 125,000 pounds.

(b) (i)  The fee for a single trip oversize and overweight permit under this Subsection (7), which is valid for not more than 96 continuous hours, is $.012 per mile for each 1,000 pounds above 80,000 pounds subject to the rounding described in Subsection (7)(c).

(ii)  The minimum fee that may be charged under this Subsection (7) is $80.

(iii)  The maximum fee that may be charged under this Subsection (7) is $540.

(c) (i)  The miles used to calculate the fee under this Subsection (7) shall be rounded up to the nearest 50 mile increment.

(ii)  The pounds used to calculate the fee under this Subsection (7) shall be rounded up to the nearest 25,000 pound increment.

(iii)  The dollar amount used to calculate the fee under this Subsection (7) shall be rounded to the nearest $10 increment.

(8) (a)  An oversize and overweight permit may be issued under this section for a vehicle or combination of vehicles carrying a divisible load if:

(i)  the bridge formula under Subsection 72-7-404(3) is not exceeded; and

(ii)  the length of the vehicle or combination of vehicles is:

(A)  more than the limitations specified under Subsections 72-7-402(4)(c) and (d) but not exceeding 81 feet in cargo carrying length and the application is for a single trip, semiannual trip, or annual trip permit; or

(B)  more than 81 feet in cargo carrying length but not exceeding 95 feet in cargo carrying length and the application is for an annual trip permit.

(b)  The fee is $60 for a single trip oversize and overweight permit under this Subsection (8).  The permit is valid for not more than 96 continuous hours.

(c)  The fee for a semiannual oversize and overweight permit under this Subsection (8), which permit is valid for not more than 180 continuous days is:

(i)  $180 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 80,000 pounds, but not exceeding 84,000 pounds;

(ii)  $320 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 84,000 pounds, but not exceeding 112,000 pounds; and

(iii)  $420 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 112,000 pounds, but not exceeding 129,000 pounds.

(d)  The fee for an annual oversize and overweight permit under this Subsection (8), which permit is valid for not more than 365 continuous days is:

(i)  $240 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 80,000 pounds, but not exceeding 84,000 pounds;

(ii)  $480 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 84,000 pounds, but not exceeding 112,000 pounds; and

(iii)  $540 for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with gross vehicle weight of more than 112,000 pounds, but not exceeding 129,000 pounds.

(9)  Permit fees collected under this section shall be credited monthly to the Transportation Fund.

(10)  The department shall prepare maps, drawings, and instructions as guidance when issuing permits under this section.

(11)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules governing the issuance and revocation of all permits under this section and Section 72-7-407.

(12)  Any person who violates any of the terms or conditions of a permit issued under this section:

(a)  may have the person's permit revoked; and

(b)  is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, except that a violation of any rule made under Subsection (11) is not subject to a criminal penalty.

